Florida, session 2026, SB1070.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSubsection (9) is added to section 110.12303, 23 Florida Statutes, to read: 24 110.12303âState group insurance program; additional 25 benefits; price transparency program; reporting.â 26 (9)(a)âFor state group health insurance plan policies 27 issued on or after January 1, 2027, the department shall provide 28 coverage for all of the following evidence-based strategies for 29 the treatment and management of obesity and related conditions, 30 as prescribed by a licensed provider: 31 1.âIntensive health behavioral and lifestyle intervention. 32 2.âFDA-approved weight management medications. 33 (b)âCoverage criteria for FDA-approved weight management 34 medications may not be more restrictive than the United States 35 Food and Drug Administration-approved indications for such 36 medications. Coverage for intensive health behavioral and 37 lifestyle treatment may include interventions certified or 38 recognized by the United States Centers for Disease Control and 39 Prevention or recommended by current clinical standards of care. 40 Services may be provided in an office setting, through 41 telehealth, or in community-based settings to support patient 42 access and needs. 43 (c)âThe department shall adopt protocols and criteria for 44 such coverage by January 1, 2027, which must include, but are 45 not limited to, that the employee: 46 1.âIs enrolled in one of the state group health insurance 47 plans or HMO plans participating under this section; 48 2.âIs 18 years of age or older; 49 3.âWas referred and is supervised by an in-network licensed 50 provider; 51 4.âHas consented to provide personal and medical 52 information to the department, including medical records 53 documenting body mass index or weight-related comorbidities; 54 5.âHas received a clinical diagnosis of obesity by an in 55 network licensed provider; 56 6.âIs required to participate in intensive health 57 behavioral and lifestyle intervention; and 58 7.âMeets any additional clinical and participation 59 requirements to manage the cost of coverage. 60 (d)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 61 1.ââFDA-approved weight management medicationâ means any 62 glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP-1) agonist medication approved by 63 the United States Food and Drug Administration with an 64 indication for chronic weight management in patients with an 65 obesity diagnosis. 66 2.ââIntensive health behavioral and lifestyle interventionâ 67 means an evidence-based, intensive, multicomponent behavioral or 68 lifestyle modification intervention designed to support healthy 69 weight management as recommended by current clinical standards 70 of care. Interventions include obesity screening, nutrition 71 assessment, nutrition diagnosis, nutrition intervention, 72 nutrition monitoring and evaluation, and behavioral counseling 73 and therapy aimed at weight loss through lifestyle 74 modifications, such as changes in diet and increased physical 75 activity. Interventions may be provided in office, through 76 telehealth, or in community-based settings to support patient 77 access and needs. Therapy for obesity must be delivered in 78 accordance with applicable national clinical standards of care, 79 using evidence-based behavioral counseling frameworks. 80 (e)âBy January 15 of each year, the department shall submit 81 a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 82 Speaker of the House of Representatives. The report must include 83 the participation level and cost savings to both the enrollee 84 and the state resulting from implementation of this subsection. 85 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.